Washington statutes.
RCW 42.45.260

Commissions in effect July 1, 2018—Continuation.

A commission as a notary public in effect on July 1, 2018, continues until its date of expiration. A notary public who applies to renew a commission as a notary public on or after July 1, 2018, is subject to and shall comply with this chapter. A notary public, in performing notarial acts after July 1, 2018, shall comply with this chapter.

[ 2017 c 281 s 28.]